Utah statutes.
77-28b-6.   Role of Inmate Placement Program Bureau.

(1)  The Department of Corrections Inmate Placement Program Bureau shall:

(a)  investigate the request to ensure that all eligibility requirements are met;

(b)  request a records check to verify records listed in Section 77-28b-3;

(c)  review application and materials for completeness and compliance with treaty terms;

(d)  develop and recommend assurances, where indicated; and

(e)  provide written notification of the transfer request to the following entities and receive objections or other comments for 15 business days after sending the notification:

(i)  attorney general;

(ii)  prosecuting law enforcement agency;

(iii)  prosecutor; and

(iv)  sentencing court.

(2)  If the Inmate Placement Program Bureau investigation determines that the application and materials are incomplete or do not comply with the terms of the treaty, the application shall be rejected and returned to the institution in which the inmate is incarcerated.

(3)  If the investigation of the bureau determines the application and materials are complete and in compliance with the terms of the treaty, the application and materials shall be forwarded to the director of the Department of Corrections.



Enacted by Chapter 324, 1990 General Session

